Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 21 Organic Certification and Labeling

2-21-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Organic Certification and Labeling Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1.

2-21-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Certification” means the verification of authentic organic practices in the production or processing of organic food or feed and is an annual process by which the producer or processor of fresh, wholesale, or retail organic food or feed receives written certification from the department or a department approved certifying entity that, through the on-site inspection of the production, storage, processing, transportation, distribution, and required audit trail practices used by an organic producer or processor, consumers are assured that organic food or feed is produced and processed in compliance with Code Section 2-21-3. For purposes of complying with Code Section 2-21-3, certification does not require membership in nor imply a contractual agreement to produce or process organic food or feed for a certifying organic organization, business, firm, or individual. However, certification or the use of organic labeling shall require the maintenance of records and documentation verifying full compliance with the organic standards. All records shall be made available to the department or an approved certifying entity upon request.

“Certifying entity” means any organization, business, firm, or individual that:

Has standards for certification of organic food or feed production or processing which meet or exceed standards set by the department and which are approved in writing by the Commissioner or his or her designee; and

Meets such education, experience, financial, and ethical standards as are set by rules promulgated by the Commissioner and meets the requirements of Chapter 5 of this title.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture of this state.

“Department” means the Georgia Department of Agriculture.

“Feed” means any article or substance normally intended to be consumed by animals for physical subsistence and health.

“Food” means any article or substance normally intended to be consumed by humans for physical subsistence and health.

“Organic” means an agriculture management system that enhances biodiversity, biological cycles, and soil biological activity to produce agricultural commodities and foster human and environmental health.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1.

2-21-3.
Certification requirements.

Upon testing, any agricultural ingredient, article, commodity, or product which is identified, labeled, advertised, packaged, or promoted as organic shall contain no more than 5 percent of a level established as toxic by the United States Food and Drug Administration, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources, or the United States Department of Agriculture.

Producers, brokers, distributors, and processors of an organic food or feed product which is identified, advertised, promoted, labeled, or packaged as organic shall keep accurate records of all purchasing, shipping, and storage practices which transpired while any organic commodity or product was in the possession of a producer, broker, distributor, or processor. Accurate records shall include the location at which such organic commodity or product originated.

On or after July 1, 2000, any qualifying organic production, distribution, or processing practices shall be deemed eligible for certification upon approval by the department. The department shall review any organic production, distribution, or processing practice which began prior to July 1, 2000, and may approve certification if such practice meets the requirements as set forth in this chapter and the standards adopted by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, in subsection (c), “July 1, 2000” was substituted for “the effective date of this chapter” at the beginning, and in the second sentence “July 1, 2000,” was substituted for “the effective date of this chapter”.

2-21-4.
Packaging and labeling; registration required.

No person may use the words “certified organic by” in the identification, advertising, promotion, packaging, or labeling of a food or feed ingredient, article, commodity, or product unless that ingredient, article, commodity, or product complies with the requirements of Code Section 2-21-3 and unless the producer, distributor, or processor has a certification in good standing from the department.

No person who produces, processes, distributes, or handles an advertised, promoted, identified, tagged, stamped, packaged, or labeled organic food or feed ingredient, article, commodity, or product may substitute or commingle any ingredient, article, commodity, or product which does not comply with Code Section 2-21-3.

Any fresh, wholesale or retail organic food or feed ingredient, article, commodity, or product shall be tagged, stamped, labeled, crated, bagged, packaged, or be in any other standardized form which complies with state and federal regulations pertaining to inspection, identity, contents, weight, measure, and grade.

Any food or feed ingredient, article, commodity, or product labeled as organic must be certified by the department or a department approved certifying entity as meeting the requirements of this chapter prior to being sold in the State of Georgia after July 1, 2000.

On and after January 1, 2003, no organization, business, firm, or individual shall act as a certifying entity in this state unless such organization, business, firm, or individual has first registered with the department. The Commissioner shall establish by regulation registration standards for producers, processors, distributors, handlers, and certifying entities not inconsistent with this chapter. Registration shall be made upon forms prescribed and furnished by the department. Registrations shall expire on the last day of December of the year for which they are issued. The Commissioner shall establish by rule a registration fee for certifying entities in an amount of not less than $75.00 nor more than $1,000.00 per annum and may establish classes of certifying entities with different registration fees for each class. Any fees collected pursuant to this Code section shall be retained pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-14/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2017, p. 618, § 1/SB 69.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted the former first sentence of subsection (e), which read: “On and after January 1, 2003, no person shall produce, process, distribute, or handle in this state any advertised, promoted, identified, tagged, stamped, packaged, or labeled organic food or feed ingredient, article, commodity, or product unless such person has first registered with the department; provided, however, that retail food sales establishments licensed under Article 2 of this chapter that do not process or repackage certified organic commodities shall be exempt from registration provisions set forth in this chapter.”

2-21-5.
Inspection and testing.

The department or a department approved certifying entity may inspect at any reasonable time any area where food or feed identified, labeled, advertised, packaged, or promoted as organic food or feed is produced, processed, stored, distributed, transported, or sold.

The department or a department approved certifying entity may require a laboratory analysis for the purpose of substantiating the standard of identity of any organic ingredient, article, commodity, or product.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1.

2-21-6.
Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations fixing and establishing reasonable definitions and standards for organic food and feed commodities or products being produced or sold within the State of Georgia.

The Commissioner may adopt, by reference, pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, known as the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” regulations for production, handling, and marketing of organically produced agricultural products as set forth by the United States Department of Agriculture.

The Commissioner is authorized by rule or regulation to adopt fees which may be charged, collected, and retained by certifying entities as compensation for the services of such certifying entities under the provisions of this chapter.

The Commissioner is authorized to adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out this chapter, to provide for the approval of certifying entities, and to provide for the certification of organic food and feed.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1.

2-21-7.
Right of appeal.

Any person, producer, broker, distributor, or processor of an organic food or feed product which is adversely affected by any action of an approved certifying entity shall have the right to appeal to the Commissioner. Such appeal and any further proceedings shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, known as the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1.

2-21-8.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-21-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1648, § 1.